Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Library Districts Formed by Petition

173.710.
Definitions for KRS 173.710 to 173.800.

“District” means “public library district”;

“Board” means the board of trustees of a public library district.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 1; 1972, ch. 223, § 9.

173.715.
County or counties may become library district.

All of the territory in a county, or in two (2) or more counties contiguous to each other may be organized into a public library district for the purpose of levying a tax to pay for establishing, equipping, maintaining and administering libraries, or for contracting for library service from any existing library.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 2.

173.720.
Organization of district — Tax collection.

Districts organized pursuant to the provisions of this section prior to July 13, 1984, shall be governed by the provisions of KRS

173.710

to

173.800

.

All special ad valorem taxes authorized by KRS

173.710

to

173.800

shall be collected in the same manner as are other county ad valorem taxes in each county affected and shall be turned over to the board as the governing body of the district. The special ad valorem tax shall be in addition to all other ad valorem taxes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 298, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 100, § 14, effective July 13, 1984.

173.725.
Library board — Members, number, appointment. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Upon the creation of a district, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall at once notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the establishment of the district and shall forward to the department a copy of the petition required pursuant to KRS

173.720

. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall then recommend to the county judge/executive of each county in the district the names of suitable persons from among the signers of the petition to be appointed to the board. The Department for Libraries and Archives in recommending persons to the county judge/executive for appointment to the board shall recommend twice as many persons for each county as the county is entitled to have members appointed, and the county judge/executive shall, with the approval of the fiscal court, immediately make the selection from those recommended. Where the district consists of one (1) county, the county judge/executive shall appoint five (5) persons from that county as members. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall prescribe by regulation the number of board members when the district consists of more than one (1) county, provided that the board shall consist of not less than one (1) nor more than four (4) members from each county, each county having such number of members as the proportion of its population bears to the total population in the district, and that the total membership of the board consists of not less than five (5) members. Where a county joins an already established district, the Department for Libraries and Archives shall, from among the signers of the petition, recommend to the county judge/executive of each county included in the new district for the first time twice as many persons for appointment to the board as the county is entitled to have appointed, and the county judge/executive shall select the members for the county from this list. The terms of the members of the counties composing the previously existing district shall expire immediately upon the organization of the new board and such vacancies shall be filled as provided in KRS

173.730

.

In making recommendations and appointments under subsection (1) of this section and KRS

173.730

, the Department for Libraries and Archives and the county judge/executive shall attempt to assure, to the extent permitted by the county’s entitlement to board members, that the board includes members from different geographical areas, and from both cities and unincorporated areas, of the county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 4; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 218, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 10, effective July 13, 1990.

173.725.
Library board — Members, number, appointment. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Upon the creation of a district, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall at once notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the establishment of the district and shall forward to the department a copy of the petition required pursuant to KRS

173.720

. The Department for Libraries and Archives shall then recommend to the county judge/executive of each county in the district the names of suitable persons from among the signers of the petition to be appointed to the board. The Department for Libraries and Archives in recommending persons to the county judge/executive for appointment to the board shall recommend twice as many persons for each county as the county is entitled to have members appointed, and the county judge/executive shall, with the approval of the fiscal court, immediately make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended by the Department for Libraries and Archives; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing, whether or not the individuals signed the petition, no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.

Where the district consists of one (1) county, the county judge/executive shall appoint five (5) persons from that county as members.

Where the district consists of more than one (1) county, the Department for Libraries and Archives shall prescribe by regulation the number of board members, provided that the board shall consist of:

Not less than one (1) nor more than four (4) members from each county, each county having such number of members as the proportion of its population bears to the total population in the district; and

Not less than five (5) members.

Where a county joins an already established district:

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall, from among the signers of the petition, recommend to the county judge/executive of each county included in the new district for the first time twice as many persons for appointment to the board as the county is entitled to have appointed, and the county judge/executive shall select the members for the county from this list unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May select the members for the county from those recommended by the Department for Libraries and Archives; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing, whether or not the individuals signed the petition, no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this subparagraph; and

The terms of the members of the counties composing the previously existing district shall expire immediately upon the organization of the new board and such vacancies shall be filled as provided in KRS

173.730

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 4; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 6, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 18, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 218, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 4, effective January 1, 2023.

173.730.
Board members — Terms — Vacancies to be filled by persons recommended by the board — Removal of members — Advisory board. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, their successors shall be recommended by the board. The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the Department for Libraries and Archives, for each vacancy. The state librarian and commissioner shall recommend those names to the county judge/executive. The county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended. Board members thus appointed shall serve a term of four (4) years each. Trustees may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee’s term, the trustee shall be considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and serve as specified in bylaws of the board of trustees.

Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred.

A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 5; 1974, ch. 8, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1980, ch. 18, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 245, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 218, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

173.730.
Board members — Terms — Vacancies to be filled by persons recommended by the board — Alternative appointment process — Removal of members — Advisory board. [Effective January 1, 2023]

One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and the remaining number shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, the board shall make recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The board shall recommend two (2) persons committed to the provision of library services to the Department for Libraries and Archives, for each vacancy. The state librarian and commissioner shall recommend those names to the county judge/executive. The county judge/executive shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the selection from those recommended by the state librarian and commissioner; and

For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointments after the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed, shall appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under of subparagraph 1.b. of this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this subparagraph.

Board members thus appointed shall serve a term of four (4) years each. Trustees may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12) months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one (1) year of the trustee’s term, the trustee shall be considered to have automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed and serve as specified in bylaws of the board of trustees.

Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal court, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the county judge/executive:

May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the appointment on the recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred; and

If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those recommendations; and

For any remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed, appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no later than thirty (30) days after the day the county judge/executive received the recommendations under paragraph (a)2. of this subsection and made no appointment therefrom. Any person appointed in accordance with this paragraph shall be committed to the provision of library services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred. The county judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.

A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS

65.007

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 5; 1974, ch. 8, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1980, ch. 18, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 245, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 218, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 58, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 5, effective January 1, 2023.

173.735.
Corporate name — Officers — Meetings — Quorum.

Each board shall be a body corporate under the name and style of “.... Public Library District Board of Trustees.” The members shall, as soon as possible after their appointment, organize by electing a president, a secretary, a treasurer, and other officers as deemed necessary each to serve for a term of two (2) years and until a successor is elected and qualified. The board shall meet on a regularly scheduled basis once each month. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 6; 1974, ch. 8, § 9; 1990, ch. 58, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

All three (3) officers of the county library district must be members of the library board.

OAG 81-39

.

Since under this section it is the treasurer and not the board who is to give the performance bond, there is no requirement that the board advertise for bids.

OAG 81-39

.

173.740.
Expenses of board members — Employment of relatives — Conflict of interest.

The members of the board shall not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties, upon vouchers duly approved by the board, signed by the secretary and countersigned by the president. No board shall newly employ as a member of its library staff any member of the board or any person related closer than a second cousin to any member of the board. No person is eligible to this office who is directly or indirectly interested in the sale to the library of books, magazines, supplies, equipment, materials, insurance, or services for which library funds are expended.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 7; 1982, ch. 245, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 13, effective July 13, 1990.

173.745.
Powers and duties of board. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The board shall establish, equip and maintain libraries or contract with existing libraries for the furnishing of library service for the district and do all things necessary to provide efficient library service. The board may also enter an agreement pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

for the provision of additional library services. No district shall establish a library unless the plans for the establishment, equipment and maintenance have been approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives. No contract shall be made unless the libraries contracting to furnish service are libraries approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives for this purpose.

The district, as a body corporate, by and through the board may:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, purchase, or lease grounds, purchase, lease, occupy or erect appropriate buildings for the use of the district libraries and their branches, sell and convey real and personal property for and on behalf of the district, receive gifts of real and personal property for the use and benefit of the district, the same when accepted to be held and controlled by the board according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise or bequest of such property;

Borrow money on the credit of the board in anticipation of the revenue to be derived from taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed, and to pledge the taxes levied for the district for the payment of the principal and interest of the loan. The principal to be repaid annually shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed.

Establish bylaws it deems necessary and expedient to define the duties of officers or employees and make all necessary policies governing libraries, library service and personnel within the district.

The board in exercise of its powers shall be guided by the regulations and requirements of the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The powers set forth in this section shall not be construed to limit, restrict or modify any powers or authority granted by KRS

173.710

to

173.800

or any other law not in conflict with the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 8; 1982, ch. 245, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 14, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where all the territory in a county, including a town containing a library, was included in a library district the district could make an agreement with the existing library to pay it an annual fee for two years to expand the existing library.

OAG 69-329

.

The six percent restriction of subsection (2)(b) of this section, applicable to library district boards, does not apply to a nonprofit construction corporation organized to build a library and lease it to the library district.

OAG 69-552

.

A library district cannot obligate itself to spend more money in a particular year than the anticipated income and revenue provided for such year.

OAG 71-34

.

The entire principal indebtedness would govern and not the amount of principal to be paid each year in measuring an obligation of the library district against the requirements of Ky. Const., § 157.

OAG 71-34

.

Where a proposed library building would exceed the debt limitations of the library district, a holding company could be used to borrow the necessary funds and lease the library building to the library district.

OAG 71-34

.

The board of a library established under KRS

173.450

to

173.650

and

173.710

to

173.800

has the duty to file with the county judge/executive an annual report and such other reports as the fiscal court may require.

OAG 78-331

.

The members of the fiscal court would not be liable for the nonexpenditure of library funds collected and turned over to the library board under subsection (4) (now (2)) of KRS

173.720

, because the library board and its treasurer, and not the members of the fiscal court, are responsible for the expenditure of funds in accordance with this section and KRS

173.755

.

OAG 81-257

.

Reading KRS

173.725

and this section in pari materia it must be concluded that KRS

173.725

implicitly provides that library district board members must, as a minimal qualification, be willing to accept the mandates of this section as to doing all things necessary to provide efficient library service.

OAG 82-202

.

A library district can qualify to issue revenue bonds under KRS Ch. 58, since it is a special taxing district under Ky. Const., § 157 and is a “governmental agency” under KRS 58.010(3); if it issues revenue bonds for a proposed project, the library district board can exercise the power to condemn real estate pursuant to KRS

58.140

. However, a library district which planned to use mortgage financing for library improvements had no power to condemn the real estate needed.

OAG 82-343

.

While KRS 173.520(1) and subsection (1) of this section provide that the library district board shall “do all things necessary to provide efficient library service,” that language does not standing alone grant the power of condemnation.

OAG 82-343

.

Under the literal provisions of subdivision (2)(b) of this section, the library board’s authority to borrow money for the district operation is clearly limited to the anticipation of the revenue to be derived form taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed; thus, the board could not borrow money in March of 1984 as a loan against tax revenues to be received during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1984.

OAG 84-109

.

173.745.
Powers and duties of board
— Approval of fiscal court, when needed. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The board shall establish, equip, and maintain libraries or contract with existing libraries for the furnishing of library service for the district and do all things necessary to provide efficient library service. The board may also enter an agreement pursuant to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

for the provision of additional library services. No district shall establish a library unless the plans for the establishment, equipment and maintenance have been approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives. No contract shall be made unless the libraries contracting to furnish service are libraries approved by the Department for Libraries and Archives for this purpose.

The district, as a body corporate, by and through the board may:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend, purchase, or lease grounds, purchase, lease, occupy or erect appropriate buildings for the use of the district libraries and their branches, lease or build to lease appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions, sell and convey real and personal property for and on behalf of the district, receive gifts of real and personal property for the use and benefit of the district, the same when accepted to be held and controlled by the board according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise or bequest of such property;

Borrow money on the credit of the board in anticipation of the revenue to be derived from taxes levied by the district for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed, and to pledge the taxes levied for the district for the payment of the principal and interest of the loan. The principal to be repaid annually shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated revenue for the fiscal year in which the money is borrowed.

Establish bylaws it deems necessary and expedient to define the duties of officers or employees and make all necessary policies governing libraries, library service and personnel within the district.

The following requires the majority vote of the board members and approval of the fiscal court:

Leasing appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions;

Constructing appropriate buildings for use by educational institutions; and

The approval of expenditures for capital projects with a total cost that is equal to or greater than one million dollars ($1,000,000). This subparagraph does not apply to awards made from the public library facilities construction fund under KRS

171.027

that were made before January 1, 2023.

Buildings for use by educational institutions shall be deemed appropriate buildings for purposes of this subsection and subsection (2) of this section when the building meets the school building requirements established by the Kentucky Board of Education.

The board in exercise of its powers shall be guided by the regulations and requirements of the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The powers set forth in this section shall not be construed to limit, restrict or modify any powers or authority granted by KRS

173.710

to

173.800

or any other law not in conflict with the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 8; 1982, ch. 245, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 58, § 14, effective July 13, 1990; 2022 ch. 221, § 6, effective January 1, 2023.

173.750.
Library director and staff.

The board shall employ a library director and upon that person’s recommendation may employ other staff as it deems necessary. The library director and staff shall be certified in accordance with the provisions of KRS

171.240

to

171.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 9; 1990, ch. 58, § 15, effective July 13, 1990.

173.755.
Duties of treasurer of board — Bond.

The treasurer of the board shall:

Have the custody of all money, securities, and obligations belonging to that district, and shall disburse money only for the uses and purposes of the district and in the manner prescribed by the bylaws on itemized vouchers allowed by the board, signed by the secretary and countersigned by the president;

Keep a full and accurate account of all receipts and payments in the manner directed by the bylaws, and such other accounts as the board prescribes;

Render statements of accounts of the several books, funds, and property of the library whenever required by the board;

Have all accounts and records for the fiscal year fully made up and present the same to the board within ninety (90) days following the close of that fiscal year;

Give bond to the Commonwealth for the faithful performance of those duties, in the sum and form and with the sureties approved by the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 10; 1990, ch. 58, § 16, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The board member/treasurer of a county library district may employ, if permitted by the bylaws, a person to actually do the work of the treasurer under the member/treasurer’s supervision and since such employment would qualify under the “uses and purposes of the district” language of this section it would be an authorized expenditure.

OAG 81-39

.

The members of the fiscal court would not be liable for the nonexpenditure of library funds collected and turned over to the library board under subsection (4) (now (2)) of KRS

173.720

, because the library board and its treasurer, and not the members of the fiscal court, are responsible for the expenditure of funds in accordance with KRS

173.745

and this section.

OAG 81-257

.

173.760.
Records open for state audit.

Every district established under KRS

173.710

to

173.800

shall at all reasonable times keep open for the inspection of the Auditor of Public Accounts all of its records and books of accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 11.

173.765.
Fiscal year.

The fiscal year of a district shall commence July 1 and close on June 30.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 12.

173.770.
Annual report — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

Within sixty (60) days after the close of each fiscal year, the board shall make a written report to the Department for Libraries and Archives. A copy of this report shall be filed with the county clerk of each county within the district. The report shall contain:

A statement of the property acquired by devise, bequests, purchase, gift, or otherwise during the fiscal year;

A statement of the character of library service furnished to the district during the fiscal year; and

Any other statistics or information requested by the Department for Libraries and Archives.

The board shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 13; 2013, ch. 40, § 61, effective March 21, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although for libraries formed by the petition method the reports required under both this section and KRS

424.220

are necessary, the library board, in making its report under this section, need only show the totals of amounts paid to each individual as salary and public utility bills with any other expenditures shown by individual voucher.

OAG 71-438

.

173.775.
Attorney for board — Employment — Authority.

The board may, in its discretion, employ or retain a regularly licensed attorney to advise them on all matters pertaining to their duties and shall have the discretion to delegate such authority to said attorney not forbidden by law.

The board may fix the salary or compensation of the attorney provided for in subsection (1) of this section, in its discretion.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 14; 1990, ch. 58, § 17, effective July 13, 1990.

173.780.
Attendance of librarians at meetings. [Repealed.]

173.785.
Revenue bonds may be issued.

Public library districts may, in addition to all other methods provided by law, acquire, construct, and improve library facilities through the issuance of revenue bonds under the terms and provisions of KRS

58.010

to

58.140

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 16.

173.790.
Increase or decrease in tax levy — Procedure.

The special ad valorem tax rate for the maintenance and operation of a public library district created pursuant to KRS

173.710

to

173.800

before July 13, 1984, shall not be increased or decreased unless a duly certified petition requesting an increase or decrease in the tax rate of a specifically stated amount is signed by fifty-one percent (51%) of the number of duly qualified voters voting at the last general election in each county in the district. Such petition shall be filed with the fiscal court in each county in the district not later than ninety (90) days after the date of the first signature. The fiscal court shall order the court to increase or decrease the ad valorem tax, as stated in the petition.

The petition shall read, “The following duly qualified voters of (insert name of county or counties) hereby petition the fiscal court of each county concerned to increase (or decrease) the special ad valorem tax from (insert exact amount) to (insert exact amount) on each one hundred dollars ($100) worth of property assessed for local taxation in the district for the maintenance and operation of the (insert name) Public Library District.”

The petition shall contain the following: The name and address of each petitioner and the date upon which he signed the petition.

Any increase provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of all property in the district.

A petition requesting a decrease in the tax rate will not be considered of any legal effect if, at any time prior to the filing of such a petition for decrease, either:

Contractual obligations have been assumed by pertinent contracting authorities in connection with said subject library, which contractual obligations would be adversely affected by any such decrease; or

If, as of the time of filing of such a petition for decrease, the board of such district shall have arranged for the financing of a library in that district pursuant to a plan of financing involving a lease of that library to the board under which lease the board is not bound for more than one (1) year at a time without exercising an annual option to renew the lease and such lease remains effective and has not been terminated; or

If less than three (3) years have passed since the certified copy of the order of the fiscal court ordering the levy of the tax was filed with the county clerk.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 17; 1970, ch. 241, § 7; 1972, ch. 223, § 10; 1978, ch. 384, § 299, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 100, § 16, effective July 13, 1984.

173.795.
Annexation of counties to district.

Counties outside of any existing district, and contiguous thereto, may be annexed to the district in the following manner:

Upon filing with the fiscal court of a duly certified petition of fifty-one percent (51%) of the duly qualified voters voting at the last general election, the fiscal court of each county in the district and each county proposed to be annexed shall adopt a resolution annexing the territory to the district. A certified copy of the order of the fiscal court shall be filed with the county clerk within the next thirty (30) days.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form:

“The following duly qualified voters of (insert name of county or counties) petition their respective fiscal courts to annex the following described territory (here describe the territory) to the (name district) public library district with the authority to levy an ad valorem tax of (state exact amount) on each one hundred dollars ($100) worth of property subject to local taxation in the above stated territory.”

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 18.

173.800.
Procedure for dissolution of district.

A district may be dissolved in the following manner:

Upon filing of a duly-certified petition of fifty-one percent (51%) of the number of qualified voters who voted in the last general election in the district, the fiscal court of each county in the district shall adopt a resolution to dissolve a library district.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form:

A certified copy of the order of the fiscal court shall be filed with the county clerk.

The county clerk or clerks in the district will thereupon remove the tax levy from the tax bills of the property owners of the district and the district shall be dissolved.

A petition for dissolution will not be considered of any legal effect if, at any time prior to the filing of such a petition for dissolution, either:

Contractual obligations have been assumed by pertinent contracting parties in connection with said subject library, which contractual obligations would be adversely affected by any such dissolution; or

If, as of the time of filing of such a petition for dissolution, the board of such district shall have arranged for the financing of a library in that district pursuant to a plan of financing involving a lease of that library to the board under which lease the board is not bound for more than one (1) year at a time without exercising an annual option to renew the lease and such lease remains effective and has not been terminated; or

If less than three (3) years have passed since the certified copy of the order of the fiscal court ordering the levy of the tax was filed with the county clerk.

After all contractual obligations, existing prior to the time of the attempted filing of such petition for dissolution, have been satisfied, then, at such time, a petition for dissolution may be effectively filed under this section, provided that other provisions of this section are complied with.

“The following qualified voters in (insert name of county or counties) favor dissolving the (insert name of district) Public Library District.” It shall be presented to the fiscal court within ninety (90) days after having been signed by the first petitioner.

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 92, § 19; 1966, ch. 154; 1970, ch. 241, § 8; 1972, ch. 223, § 11; 1978, ch. 384, § 300, effective June 17, 1978.